Massachusetts, session 194th, H4499.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION l. Chapter 503 of the acts of 1952, as most recently amended by section 1 of
chapter 10 of the acts of 2022, is hereby further amended by inserting after section 8A the
following section:-
Section 8B. Ranked Choice Voting
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Concluded ballot”, a ballot that does not rank any continuing candidate or contains an
overvote at the highest-ranked continuing candidate.
“Continuing candidate”, a candidate who has not been defeated.
of 4

“Highest-ranked continuing candidate”, the continuing candidate with the highest ranking
on a voter's ballot. Where a ballot omits l or more rankings, the next highest ranking shall be
used for determining the highest-ranked continuing candidate.
“Overvote”, a circumstance in which a voter ranks more than 1 candidate at the same
ranking.
“Ranked choice voting”, a method of casting and tabulating ballots in which voters rank
candidates for office in order of preference.
“Ranking”, the number assigned on a ballot by a voter to a candidate to express the
voter's preference for that candidate. Ranking number 1 shall be the highest ranking, ranking
number 2 shall be the next-highest ranking and so on.
(b) The offices of select board member, school committee member, moderator, elected
member of the board of the housing authority and assessor shall be elected by ranked choice
voting, except for single-seat offices when the number of candidates printed on the ballot is less
than or equal to 2 or multi-seat offices when the number of candidates printed on the ballot is
less than or equal to the number of seats to be elected. Rank choice voting elections shall be
tabulated in rounds pursuant to this section.
(c) In any single-seat election, each round shall begin by counting the number of votes for
each continuing candidate. Each ballot shall count as 1 vote for its highest-ranked continuing
candidate. Concluded ballots shall not be counted for any continuing candidate. Each round shall
end with 1 of the following 2 outcomes:
of 4

(1) If there are 2 continuing candidates, the candidate with the most votes shall be
elected, and tabulation shall be complete.
(2) Otherwise, the candidate with the fewest votes shall be defeated and a new round
shall begin.
(d) In any multi-seat election, the first seat shall be filled pursuant to the tabulation
process established in subsection (c). The remaining seats shall be filled by repeated application
of the tabulation process established in subsection (c); provided, however, that all votes marked
for candidates who have already been elected shall be disregarded and votes shall be counted for
the next highest-ranked continuing candidate.
(e) If 2 or more candidates are tied with the fewest votes such that tabulation cannot
continue until the candidate with the fewest votes is defeated, then the tied candidate with the
fewest votes in the prior round shall be defeated. If 2 or more such tied candidates were tied with
the fewest votes in the prior round, the second tie shall be decided by referring similarly to the
number of votes for each candidate in the second-prior round. This process shall be applied
successively as many times as necessary. The town clerk shall establish a method of tiebreaking
that will be used if 2 or more candidates are tied with the fewest votes in the first round of
tabulation.
(f) The town clerk may make any changes, subject to approval by the select board, to the
ranked choice voting ballot and tabulation process necessary to ensure the integrity and smooth
functioning of the election; provided, that ranked choice voting shall still be used and the fewest
number of changes shall be made to achieve such purpose.
(g) The town clerk shall publish election results that show the tabulation by rounds.
of 4

SECTION 2. (A) The following question shall be placed on the ballot to be used at a
regular state or town election or at a special election called for the purpose of presenting the
question to the voters:
Shall an act entitled "An Act Authorizing Ranked Choice Voting in the Town of
Arlington" be accepted?
(B) The town attorney shall prepare the summary of the proposed legislation, which shall
appear on the ballot along with the question provided in paragraph (A) of this section.
(C) If a majority of votes cast in answer to the question is in the affirmative, section 1 of
this act shall take effect in the town of Arlington, but not otherwise.
SECTION 3. Section 2 shall take effect upon the passage of this act.
of 4